Virginia statutes. Title 8.4A. Commercial Code—Funds Transfers.
PART 2. Issue and Acceptance of Payment Order.

§ 8.4A-201.
Security procedure.

“Security procedure” means a procedure established by agreement of a customer and a receiving bank for the purpose of (i) verifying that a payment order or communication amending or cancelling a payment order is that of the customer, or (ii) detecting error in the transmission or the content of the payment order or communication.
A security procedure may require the use of algorithms or other codes, identifying words or numbers, encryption, callback procedures, or similar security devices.
Comparison of a signature on a payment order or communication with an authorized specimen signature of the customer is not by itself a security procedure.

History.

1990, c. 9.

§ 8.4A-202.
Authorized and verified payment orders.

A payment order received by the receiving bank is the authorized order of the person identified as sender if that person authorized the order or is otherwise bound by it under the law of agency.

If a bank and its customer have agreed that the authenticity of payment orders issued to the bank in the name of the customer as sender will be verified pursuant to a security procedure, a payment order received by the receiving bank is effective as the order of the customer, whether or not authorized, if (i) the security procedure is a commercially reasonable method of providing security against unauthorized payment orders, and (ii) the bank proves that it accepted the payment order in good faith and in compliance with the security procedure and any written agreement or instruction of the customer restricting acceptance of payment orders issued in the name of the customer. The bank is not required to follow an instruction that violates a written agreement with the customer or notice of which is not received at a time and in a manner affording the bank a reasonable opportunity to act on it before the payment order is accepted.

Commercial reasonableness of a security procedure is a question of law to be determined by considering the wishes of the customer expressed to the bank, the circumstances of the customer known to the bank, including the size, type, and frequency of payment orders normally issued by the customer to the bank, alternative security procedures offered to the customer, and security procedures in general use by customers and receiving banks similarly situated. A security procedure is deemed to be commercially reasonable if (i) the security procedure was chosen by the customer after the bank offered, and the customer refused, a security procedure that was commercially reasonable for that customer, and (ii) the customer expressly agreed in writing to be bound by any payment order, whether or not authorized, issued in its name and accepted by the bank in compliance with the security procedure chosen by the customer.

The term “sender” in this title includes the customer in whose name a payment order is issued if the order is the authorized order of the customer under subsection (a) of this section, or it is effective as the order of the customer under subsection (b) of this section.

This section applies to amendments and cancellations of payment orders to the same extent it applies to payment orders.

Except as provided in this section and in subdivision (a) (1) of §

8.4A-203

, rights and obligations arising under this section or §

8.4A-203

may not be varied by agreement.

History.

1990, c. 9.

§ 8.4A-203.
Unenforceability of certain verified payment orders.

If an accepted payment order is not, under subsection (a) of §

8.4A-202

, an authorized order of a customer identified as sender, but is effective as an order of the customer pursuant to subsection (b) of §

8.4A-202

, the following rules apply:

By express written agreement, the receiving bank may limit the extent to which it is entitled to enforce or retain payment of the payment order.

The receiving bank is not entitled to enforce or retain payment of payment order if the customer proves that the order was not caused, directly or indirectly, by a person (i) entrusted at any time with duties to act for the customer with respect to payment orders or the security procedure, or (ii) who obtained access to transmitting facilities of the customer or who obtained, from a source controlled by the customer and without authority of the receiving bank, information facilitating breach of the security procedure, regardless of how the information was obtained or whether the customer was at fault. Information includes any access device, computer software, or the like.

This section applies to amendments of payment orders to the same extent it applies to payment orders.

History.

1990, c. 9.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

3A M.J. Banks and Banking, § 45.

§ 8.4A-204.
Refund of payment and duty of customer to report with respect to unauthorized payment order.

If a receiving bank accepts a payment order issued in the name of its customer as sender which is (i) not authorized and not effective as the order of the customer under §

8.4A-202

, or (ii) not enforceable, in whole or in part, against the customer under §

8.4A-203

, the bank shall refund any payment of the payment order received from the customer to the extent the bank is not entitled to enforce payment and shall pay interest on the refundable amount calculated from the date the bank received payment to the date of the refund. However, the customer is not entitled to interest from the bank on the amount to be refunded if the customer fails to exercise ordinary care to determine that the order was not authorized by the customer and to notify the bank of the relevant facts within a reasonable time not exceeding 90 days after the date the customer received notification from the bank that the order was accepted or that the customer’s account was debited with respect to the order. The bank is not entitled to any recovery from the customer on account of a failure by the customer to give notification as stated in this section.

Reasonable time under subsection (a) of this section may be fixed by agreement as stated in subsection (b) of §

8.1A-302

, but the obligation of a receiving bank to refund payment as stated in subsection (a) of this section may not otherwise be varied by agreement.

History.

1990, c. 9; 2003, c. 353.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 353, in subsection (a), substituted “90” for “ninety,” and in subsection (b), substituted “(b) of §

8.1A-302

” for “(1) of § 8.1-204.”

§ 8.4A-205.
Erroneous payment orders.

If an accepted payment order was transmitted pursuant to a security procedure for the detection of error and the payment order (i) erroneously instructed payment to a beneficiary not intended by the sender, (ii) erroneously instructed payment in an amount greater than the amount intended by the sender, or (iii) was an erroneously transmitted duplicate of a payment order previously sent by the sender, the following rules apply:

If the sender proves that the sender or a person acting on behalf of the sender pursuant to §

8.4A-206

complied with the security procedure and that the error would have been detected if the receiving bank had also complied, the sender is not obliged to pay the order to the extent stated in subdivisions (2) and (3) of this subsection.

If the funds transfer is completed on the basis of an erroneous payment order described in clause (i) or (iii) of this subsection, the sender is not obliged to pay the order and the receiving bank is entitled to recover from the beneficiary any amount paid to the beneficiary to the extent allowed by the law governing mistake and restitution.

If the funds transfer is completed on the basis of a payment order described in clause (ii) of this subsection, the sender is not obliged to pay the order to the extent the amount received by the beneficiary is greater than the amount intended by the sender. In that case, the receiving bank is entitled to recover from the beneficiary the excess amount received to the extent allowed by the law governing mistake and restitution.

If (i) the sender of an erroneous payment order described in subsection (a) of this section is not obliged to pay all or part of the order, and (ii) the sender receives notification from the receiving bank that the order was accepted by the bank or that the sender’s account was debited with respect to the order, the sender has a duty to exercise ordinary care, on the basis of information available to the sender, to discover the error with respect to the order and to advise the bank of the relevant facts within a reasonable time, not exceeding ninety days, after the bank’s notification was received by the sender. If the bank proves that the sender failed to perform that duty, the sender is liable to the bank for the loss the bank proves it incurred as a result of the failure, but the liability of the sender may not exceed the amount of the sender’s order.

This section applies to amendments to payment orders to the same extent it applies to payment orders.

History.

1990, c. 9.

§ 8.4A-206.
Transmission of payment order through funds-transfer or other communication system.

If a payment order addressed to a receiving bank is transmitted to a funds-transfer system or other third-party communication system for transmittal to the bank, the system is deemed to be an agent of the sender for the purpose of transmitting the payment order to the bank. If there is a discrepancy between the terms of the payment order transmitted to the system and the terms of the payment order transmitted by the system to the bank, the terms of the payment order of the sender are those transmitted by the system. This section does not apply to a funds-transfer system of the Federal Reserve Banks.

This section applies to cancellations and amendments of payment orders to the same extent it applies to payment orders.

History.

1990, c. 9.

§ 8.4A-207.
Misdescription of beneficiary.

Subject to subsection (b) of this section, if, in a payment order received by the beneficiary’s bank, the name, bank account number, or other identification of the beneficiary refers to a nonexistent or unidentifiable person or account, no person has rights as a beneficiary of the order and acceptance of the order cannot occur.

If a payment order received by the beneficiary’s bank identifies the beneficiary both by name and by an identifying or bank account number and the name and number identify different persons, the following rules apply:

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (c) of this section, if the beneficiary’s bank does not know that the name and number refer to different persons, it may rely on the number as the proper identification of the beneficiary of the order. The beneficiary’s bank need not determine whether the name and number refer to the same person.

If the beneficiary’s bank pays the person identified by name or knows that the name and number identify different persons, no person has rights as beneficiary except the person paid by the beneficiary’s bank if that person was entitled to receive payment from the originator of the funds transfer. If no person has rights as beneficiary, acceptance of the order cannot occur.

If (i) a payment order described in subsection (b) of this section is accepted, (ii) the originator’s payment order described the beneficiary inconsistently by name and number, and (iii) the beneficiary’s bank pays the person identified by number as permitted by subdivision (b) (1) of this section, the following rules apply:

If the originator is a bank, the originator is obliged to pay its order.

If the originator is not a bank and proves that the person identified by number was not entitled to receive payment from the originator, the originator is not obliged to pay its order unless the originator’s bank proves that the originator, before acceptance of the originator’s order, had notice that payment of a payment order issued by the originator might be made by the beneficiary’s bank on the basis of an identifying or bank account number even if it identifies a person different from the named beneficiary. Proof of notice may be made by any admissible evidence. The originator’s bank satisfies the burden of proof if it proves that the originator, before the payment order was accepted, signed a writing stating the information to which the notice relates.

In a case governed by subdivision (b) (1) of this section, if the beneficiary’s bank rightfully pays the person identified by number and that person was not entitled to receive payment from the originator, the amount paid may be recovered from that person to the extent allowed by the law governing mistake and restitution as follows:

If the originator is obliged to pay its payment order as stated in subsection (c) of this section, the originator has the right to recover.

If the originator is not a bank and is not obliged to pay its payment order, the originator’s bank has the right to recover.

History.

1990, c. 9.

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Applicability. —

Demurrer to a §

8.4A-207

claim was sustained where the LLC and its sole member could not ignore that §

8.4A-207(b)

most likely applied, and thus, they needed to add factual allegations to more clearly support their position. AG4 Holding, LLC v. Regency Title & Escrow Servs., 98 Va. Cir. 89, 2018 Va. Cir. LEXIS 8 (Fairfax County Jan. 24, 2018).

Preemption. —

Bank’s objection to the negligence claim was not sustained where it was unclear whether the claim was preempted by §§

8.4A-211

and

8.4A-212

, other than duty, the elements of negligence had been sufficiently pled, and the economic loss rule did not apply given the allegations of fraud and a misstep by the bank that resulted in the disappearance of funds. AG4 Holding, LLC v. Regency Title & Escrow Servs., 98 Va. Cir. 89, 2018 Va. Cir. LEXIS 8 (Fairfax County Jan. 24, 2018).

Conversion claim was preempted by §

8.4A-404(a)

where the statute expressly stated that the bank had an obligation to pay the funds to the beneficiary listed on the order at the moment of acceptance. AG4 Holding, LLC v. Regency Title & Escrow Servs., 98 Va. Cir. 89, 2018 Va. Cir. LEXIS 8 (Fairfax County Jan. 24, 2018).

§ 8.4A-208.
Misdescription of intermediary bank or beneficiary’s bank.

This subsection applies to a payment order identifying an intermediary bank or the beneficiary’s bank only by an identifying number.

The receiving bank may rely on the number as the proper identification of the intermediary or beneficiary’s bank and need not determine whether the number identifies a bank.

The sender is obliged to compensate the receiving bank for any loss and expenses incurred by the receiving bank as a result of its reliance on the number in executing or attempting to execute the order.

This subsection applies to a payment order identifying an intermediary bank or the beneficiary’s bank both by name and an identifying number if the name and number identify different persons.

If the sender is a bank, the receiving bank may rely on the number as the proper identification of the intermediary or beneficiary’s bank if the receiving bank, when it executes the sender’s order, does not know that the name and number identify different persons. The receiving bank need not determine whether the name and number refer to the same person or whether the number refers to a bank. The sender is obliged to compensate the receiving bank for any loss and expenses incurred by the receiving bank as a result of its reliance on the number in executing or attempting to execute the order.

If the sender is not a bank and the receiving bank proves that the sender, before the payment order was accepted, had notice that the receiving bank might rely on the number as the proper identification of the intermediary or beneficiary’s bank even if it identifies a person different from the bank identified by name, the rights and obligations of the sender and the receiving bank are governed by subdivision (b) (1) of this section, as though the sender were a bank. Proof of notice may be made by any admissible evidence. The receiving bank satisfies the burden of proof if it proves that the sender, before the payment order was accepted, signed in writing stating the information to which the notice relates.

Regardless of whether the sender is a bank, the receiving bank may rely on the name as the proper identification of the intermediary or beneficiary’s bank if the receiving bank, at the time it executes the sender’s order, does not know that the name and number identify different persons. The receiving bank need not determine whether the name and number refer to the same person.

If the receiving bank knows that the name and number identify different persons, reliance on either the name or the number in executing the sender’s payment order is a breach of the obligation stated in subdivision (a) (1) of §

8.4A-302

.

History.

1990, c. 9.

§ 8.4A-209.
Acceptance of payment order.

Subject to subsection (d) of this section, a receiving bank other than the beneficiary’s bank accepts a payment order when it executes the order.

Subject to subsections (c) and (d) of this section, a beneficiary’s bank accepts a payment order at the earliest of the following times:

When the bank (i) pays the beneficiary as stated in subsection (a) or (b) of §

8.4A-405

, or (ii) notifies the beneficiary of receipt of the order or that the account of the beneficiary has been credited with respect to the order unless the notice indicates that the bank is rejecting the order or that funds with respect to the order may not be withdrawn or used until receipt of payment from the sender of the order;

When the bank receives payment of the entire amount of the sender’s order pursuant to subdivision (a) (1) or (a) (2) of §

8.4A-403

; or

The opening of the next funds-transfer business day of the bank following the payment date of the order if, at that time, the amount of the sender’s order is fully covered by a withdrawable credit balance in an authorized account of the sender or the bank has otherwise received full payment from the sender, unless the order was rejected before that time or is rejected within (i) one hour after that time, or (ii) one hour after the opening of the next business day of the sender following the payment date if that time is later. If notice of rejection is received by the sender after the payment date and the authorized account of the sender does not bear interest, the bank is obliged to pay interest to the sender on the amount of the order for the number of days elapsing after the payment date to the day the sender receives notice or learns that the order was not accepted, counting that day as an elapsed day. If the withdrawable-credit balance during that period falls below the amount of the order, the amount of interest payable is reduced accordingly.

Acceptance of a payment order cannot occur before the order is received by the receiving bank. Acceptance does not occur under subdivision (b) (2) or (b) (3) of this section if the beneficiary of the payment order does not have an account with the receiving bank, the account has been closed, or the receiving bank is not permitted by law to receive credits for the beneficiary’s account.

A payment order issued to the originator’s bank cannot be accepted until the payment date if the bank is the beneficiary’s bank, or the execution date if the bank is not the beneficiary’s bank. If the originator’s bank executes the originator’s payment order before the execution date or pays the beneficiary of the originator’s payment order before the payment date and the payment order is subsequently canceled pursuant to subsection (b) of §

8.4A-211

, the bank may recover from the beneficiary any payment received to the extent allowed by the law governing mistake and restitution.

History.

1990, c. 9.

§ 8.4A-210.
Rejection of payment order.

A payment order is rejected by the receiving bank by a notice of rejection transmitted to the sender orally, electronically, or in writing. A notice of rejection need not use any particular words and is sufficient if it indicates that the receiving bank is rejecting the order or will not execute or pay the order. Rejection is effective when the notice is given if transmission is by a means that is reasonable in the circumstances. If notice of rejection is given by a means that is not reasonable, rejection is effective when the notice is received. If an agreement of the sender and receiving bank establishes the means to be used to reject a payment order, (i) any means complying with the agreement is reasonable and (ii) any means not complying is not reasonable unless no significant delay in receipt of the notice resulted from the use of the noncomplying means.

This subsection applies if a receiving bank other than the beneficiary’s bank fails to execute a payment order despite the existence on the execution date of a withdrawable credit balance in an authorized account of the sender sufficient to cover the order. If the sender does not receive notice of rejection of the order on the execution date and the authorized account of the sender does not bear interest, the bank is obliged to pay interest to the sender on the amount of the order for the number of days elapsing after the execution date to the earlier of the day the order is canceled pursuant to subsection (d) of §

8.4A-211

or the day the sender receives notice or learns that the order was not executed, counting the final day of the period as an elapsed day. If the withdrawable credit balance during that period falls below the amount of the order, the amount of interest is reduced accordingly.

If a receiving bank suspends payments, all unaccepted payment orders issued to it are deemed rejected at the time the bank suspends payments.

Acceptance of a payment order precludes a later rejection of the order. Rejection of a payment order precludes a later acceptance of the order.

History.

1990, c. 9.

§ 8.4A-211.
Cancellation and amendment of payment order.

A communication of the sender of a payment order cancelling or amending the order may be transmitted to the receiving bank orally, electronically, or in writing. If a security procedure is in effect between the sender and the receiving bank, the communication is not effective to cancel or amend the order unless the communication is verified pursuant to the security procedure or the bank agrees to the cancellation or amendment.

Subject to subsection (a) of this section, a communication by the sender cancelling or amending a payment order is effective to cancel or amend the order if notice of the communication is received at a time and in a manner affording the receiving bank a reasonable opportunity to act on the communication before the bank accepts the payment order.

After a payment order has been accepted, cancellation or amendment of the order is not effective unless the receiving bank agrees or a funds-transfer system rule allows cancellation or amendment without agreement of the bank.

With respect to a payment order accepted by a receiving bank other than the beneficiary’s bank, cancellation or amendment is not effective unless a conforming cancellation or amendment of the payment order issued by the receiving bank is also made.

With respect to a payment order accepted by the beneficiary’s bank, cancellation or amendment is not effective unless the order was issued in execution of an unauthorized payment order, or because of a mistake by a sender in the funds transfer which resulted in the issuance of a payment order (i) that is a duplicate of a payment order previously issued by the sender, (ii) that orders payment to a beneficiary not entitled to receive payment from the originator, or (iii) that orders payment in an amount greater than the amount the beneficiary was entitled to receive from the originator. If the payment order is canceled or amended, the beneficiary’s bank is entitled to recover from the beneficiary any amount paid to the beneficiary to the extent allowed by the law governing mistake and restitution.

An unaccepted payment order is canceled by operation of law at the close of the fifth funds-transfer business day of the receiving bank after the execution date or payment date of the order.

A canceled payment order cannot be accepted. If an accepted payment order is canceled, the acceptance is nullified and no person has any right or obligation based on the acceptance. Amendment of a payment order is deemed to be cancellation of the original order at the time of amendment and issue of a new payment order in the amended form at the same time.

Unless otherwise provided in an agreement of the parties or in a funds-transfer system rule, if the receiving bank, after accepting a payment order, agrees to cancellation or amendment of the order by the sender or is bound by a funds-transfer system rule allowing cancellation or amendment without the bank’s agreement, the sender, whether or not cancellation or amendment is effective, is liable to the bank for any loss and expenses, including reasonable attorney’s fees, incurred by the bank as a result of the cancellation or amendment or attempted cancellation or amendment.

A payment order is not revoked by the death or legal incapacity of the sender unless the receiving bank knows of the death or of an adjudication of incapacity by a court of competent jurisdiction and has reasonable opportunity to act before acceptance of the order.

A funds-transfer system rule is not effective to the extent it conflicts with subdivision (c) (2) of this section.

History.

1990, c. 9.

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Preemption. —

Bank’s objection to the negligence claim was not sustained where it was unclear whether the claim was preempted by §§

8.4A-211

and

8.4A-212

, other than duty, the elements of negligence had been sufficiently pled, and the economic loss rule did not apply given the allegations of fraud and a misstep by the bank that resulted in the disappearance of funds. AG4 Holding, LLC v. Regency Title & Escrow Servs., 98 Va. Cir. 89, 2018 Va. Cir. LEXIS 8 (Fairfax County Jan. 24, 2018).

§ 8.4A-212.
Liability and duty of receiving bank regarding unaccepted payment order.

If a receiving bank fails to accept a payment order that it is obliged by express agreement to accept, the bank is liable for breach of the agreement to the extent provided in the agreement or in this title, but does not otherwise have any duty to accept a payment order or, before acceptance, to take any action, or refrain from taking action, with respect to the order except as provided in this title or by express agreement.
Liability based on acceptance arises only when acceptance occurs as stated in §

8.4A-209

, and liability is limited to that provided in this title.
A receiving bank is not the agent of the sender or beneficiary of the payment order it accepts, or of any other party to the funds transfer, and the bank owes no duty to any party to the funds transfer except as provided in this title or by express agreement.

History.

1990, c. 9.

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Preemption. —

Bank’s objection to the negligence claim was not sustained where it was unclear whether the claim was preempted by §§

8.4A-211

and

8.4A-212

, other than duty, the elements of negligence had been sufficiently pled, and the economic loss rule did not apply given the allegations of fraud and a misstep by the bank that resulted in the disappearance of funds. AG4 Holding, LLC v. Regency Title & Escrow Servs., 98 Va. Cir. 89, 2018 Va. Cir. LEXIS 8 (Fairfax County Jan. 24, 2018).